Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB354.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible activities" means any of the following:
1. Provision of matching funds for federal moneys relating to continuum
of care;
2. Construction of new housing units to provide transitional or
permanent housing;
3. Acquisition or rehabilitation of a structure to provide transitional or
permanent housing, other than emergency shelter;
4. Leasing of property, or portions of property, not owned by the
recipient or project sponsor involved, for use in providing transitional
or permanent housing;
5. Providing rental assistance to provide transitional or permanent
housing;
6. Payment of operating costs for housing units assisted by a continuum
of care grant or for the preservation of housing that will serve
homeless individuals and families and for which another form of
assistance is expiring or otherwise no longer available; or
7. Any other supportive services that provide transitional or permanent
housing for individuals and families who:
a. Are currently experiencing homelessness; or
b. Were previously homeless and currently reside in temporary
supportive housing; and
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 11/19/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 453
(b) "Eligible entity" means any entity within this state that is:
1. A nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)
of the Internal Revenue Code;
2. A local government; or
3. An instrumentality of a local government.
(2) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the homelessness prevention fund. This fund shall be administered by
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The fund shall consist of moneys
received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and interest or
other return on the investment of fund moneys under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of
the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section.
(4) The purposes of the fund shall be to:
(a) Promote community-wide commitment to the goal of ending homelessness;
(b) Provide funding for efforts by an eligible entity to rehouse homeless
individuals and families quickly while minimizing the trauma and
dislocation caused to individuals, families, and communities by
homelessness; and
(c) Optimize self-sufficiency among individuals and families currently
experiencing homelessness.
(5) The cabinet shall award grants from the homelessness prevention fund for an
eligible entity to carry out eligible activities.
(6) All loan repayment, interest, or other return on the investment of fund moneys
shall be deposited in the fund and used for eligible activities in accordance with
this section.
(7) The cabinet shall:
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 11/19/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 453
(a) Maintain and update on a quarterly basis a website that provides
information on the availability of moneys in the fund,
(b) Create the form by which an eligible entity may apply for available moneys
in the fund;
(c) Approve or deny properly submitted and completed grant applications
within ninety (90) days of receipt;
(d) Provide notification to the eligible entity of approval or denial of its grant
application; and
(e) Approve as many grant applications as will effectively use available moneys
in the fund.
(8) Criteria established by the cabinet for approving or denying grant applications
under this section shall include:
(a) The previous performance of the applicant regarding homelessness as
measured by criteria that includes:
1. The length of time individuals and families remain homeless after
assistance from the eligible entity;
2. The extent to which individuals and families who leave homelessness
after assistance from the eligible entity experience additional spells of
homelessness;
3. The ability of the eligible entity to reach homeless individuals and
families;
4. Overall reduction in the number of homeless individuals and families
within the geographic area that the eligible entity serves;
5. Jobs and income growth for homeless individuals and families who
received assistance from the eligible entity; and
6. Other achievements by the applicant related to reducing
homelessness; and
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 11/19/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 453
(b) The plan of the applicant, which describes:
1. How the number of individuals and families who become homeless
will be reduced in the community;
2. How the length of time that individuals and families remain homeless
will be reduced;
3. How the applicant will collaborate with local educational agencies to
assist in the identification of individuals and families who become or
remain homeless;
4. How individuals and families will be informed of their eligibility for
services; and
5. The extent to which the applicant will:
a. Address the needs of all relevant subpopulations;
b. Incorporate comprehensive strategies for reducing
homelessness;
c. Set quantifiable performance measures;
d. Set timelines for completion of specific tasks;
e. Identify specific funding sources for planned activities; and
f. Identify an individual or body responsible for overseeing
implementation of specific strategies.
(9) The cabinet may retain up to ten percent (10%) of the active project funds to
cover the administrative and compliance-related costs of the fund.
Section 2. KRS 198A.027 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) Notwithstanding any statute, administrative regulation, or common law to the
contrary, ]Appropriations from the general fund[,] or any restricted fund[, or the
road fund] may[shall not] be expended by any state or local officer, official,
employee, or agency for any initiatives to provide permanent housing to homeless
individuals[ if those initiatives lack behavioral and rehabilitative requirements.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 11/19/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 453
Behavioral and rehabilitative requirements shall at a minimum include requirements
that the initiative facilitate appropriate treatment of any mental health conditions or
substance use disorders and prohibit criminal activity.
(2) This section shall not apply to statutorily created housing programs or to domestic
violence shelters as defined in KRS 511.085].
Section 3. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 in the amount of $2,000,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 to the homelessness prevention fund for the purposes set forth in
Section 1 of this Act.
Section 4. Whereas providing timely funding for homelessness prevention in
the Commonwealth is important for the citizens of this state, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 11/19/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed